Alabama, session 2026rs, HB433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 17-5-8.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§17-5-8.1
(a) Commencing with the 2014 election cycle, all All
statements, reports of contributions, and expenditures, and
other filings required to be filed pursuant to this chapter,
shall be submitted electronically over the Internet by a
computer file containing the report information in a format
and medium to be prescribed by the Secretary of State.
(b) Commencing with the 2014 election cycle, the The
Secretary of State shall implement and maintain an electronic
database accessible by the public through the Secretary of
State's website which provides the capability of search and
Page 1

State's website which provides the capability of search and
HB433 Engrossed
retrieval of all statements, reports, and other filings
required to be filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to
this chapter. The electronic database shall be called the
Alabama Fair Campaign Practices Act (FCPA) Reporting System.
The searchable database shall provide the ability to search by
a recipient's name, a contributor's name, a contributor's or
recipient's Zip Code, and dates of contributions. Before
publishing any statements, reports, or other filings on the
searchable Alabama FCPA Reporting System database, the
Secretary of State shall redact the address of any principal
campaign committee.
(c) Unless otherwise included in a report made pursuant
to subsection (a) of Section 17-5-8(a), the principal campaign
committee or political action committee shall file a report
disclosing the receipt of any single contribution of twenty
thousand dollars ($20,000) or more. These reports shall
disclose the same information required by Section 17-5-8, and
shall be filed within two business days of receipt of the
contribution. Beginning with the 2014 election cycle these
reports shall be filed electronically.
(d) Beginning with the 2012 election cycle, a A
principal campaign committee or political action committee
shall close its books in order to complete its reports two
days prior to the specified reporting dates.
(e) The Secretary of State may promulgate
administrative adopt rules pursuant to the Alabama
Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement and
administer this section and Section 17-5-8."
Page 2

administer this section and Section 17-5-8."
HB433 Engrossed
Section 2. This act shall become effective February 1,
2027.
Page 3

2027.
HB433 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................12-Feb-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Constitution, Campaigns
and Elections

Read for the second time and placed ................05-Mar-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................17-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 105
Nays 0
Abstains 0


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 4